Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 2. Congressional, Senatorial, and House of Delegates Districts.
(601) Precincts.Seventy-sixth. Part of the City of Chesapeake comprised of the Bailey Creek (038), Churchland (004), Deep Creek (006), E. W. Chittum School (020), Fellowship (021), John T. West (041), Jolliff One (019), Nansemond (044), and Silverwood (027) Precincts; and part of the City of Suffolk comprised of the Airport (401), Bennetts Creek (104), Chuckatuck (202), Cypress Chapel (303), Driver (102), Ebenezer (201), Elephants Fork/Westhaven (603), Kilby’s Mill (501), King’s Fork (203), Lake Cohoon (504), and Nansemond River (703) Precincts and parts of the John F. Kennedy (302) and Lakeside (601) Precincts.Seventy-seventh. Part of the City of Chesapeake comprised of the Camelot (003), Carver School (031), Crestwood (005), Indian River (018), Johnson Park (026), Joliff Middle School (048), Norfolk Highlands (022), Oaklette (024), Oscar Smith School (010), Providence (032), South Norfolk (030), South Norfolk Recreation (008), St. Julians (025), Sunray I (028), Sunray II (045), and Tanglewood (029) Precincts and part of the Georgetown (012) Precinct; and part of the City of Suffolk comprised of the Hollywood (701), Olde Towne (602), Southside (403), and White Marsh (301) Precincts and parts of the John F. Kennedy (302) and Lakeside (601) Precincts.Seventy-eighth. Part of the City of Chesapeake comprised of the B. M. Williams School (015), Bells Mill II (046), Bridgetown (037), Coopers Way (051), Fairways (053), Great Bridge (001), Great Bridge Baptist Church (036), Greenbrier (007), Hickory Grove (016), Hickory Middle School (034), Oak Grove (023), Parkways (042), Pleasant Crossing (043), River Birch (040), and Westover (033) Precincts and parts of the Georgetown (012) and Green Sea (047) Precincts.Seventy-ninth. Part of the City of Norfolk comprised of the Old Dominion (201) and Taylor Elementary School (213) Precincts and parts of the Titustown Center (104) and Zion Grace (106) Precincts; and part of the City of Portsmouth comprised of the Seven (007), Ten (010), Twenty-Two (022), Twenty-Three (023), Twenty-Four (024), Twenty-Five (025), Thirty (030), Thirty-Five (035), Thirty-Six (036), Thirty-Seven (037), and Thirty-Nine (039) Precincts and part of the Nine (009) Precinct.Eightieth. Part of the City of Chesapeake comprised of the Taylor Road (035) Precinct; part of the City of Norfolk comprised of the Chrysler Museum (211) Precinct; part of the City of Portsmouth comprised of the One (001), Five (005), Eleven (011), Thirteen (013), Fourteen (014), Sixteen (016), Seventeen (017), Nineteen (019), Twenty (020), Twenty-One (021), Twenty-Six (026), Twenty-Seven (027), Twenty-Eight (028), Twenty-Nine (029), Thirty-One (031), Thirty-Two (032), Thirty-Three (033), Thirty-Four (034), and Thirty-Eight (038) Precincts and part of the Nine (009) Precinct; and part of the City of Suffolk comprised of the Harbour View (103) and Yeates (705) Precincts.Eighty-first. Part of the City of Chesapeake comprised of the Bells Mill (009), Bethel (002), Geneva Park (011), Gilmerton (013), Grassfield (014), Indian Creek (017), Lake Drummond (039), River Walk (050), and Shipyard Road (052) Precincts and part of the Green Sea (047) Precinct; and part of the City of Virginia Beach comprised of the Blackwater (034), Capps Shop (033), Corporate Landing (070), Creeds (032), Culver (063), Oceana (050), Redwing (030), Rudee (072), Seatack (005), and Sigma (031) Precincts.Eighty-second. Part of the City of Virginia Beach comprised of the Alanton (006), Cape Henry (011), Colony (075), Eastern Shore (067), Edinburgh (056), Great Neck (010), Kings Grant (047), Linkhorn (004), London Bridge (008), Lynnhaven (049), Malibu (014), North Beach (001), Pinewood (094), Plaza (012), South Beach (002), Thalia (028), Trantwood (009), and Wolfsnare (048) Precincts.Eighty-third. Part of the City of Norfolk comprised of the Azalea Gardens (512), Barron Black (406), Bayview School (501), East Ocean View (503), Larrymore (504), Little Creek (505), Tarrallton (509), and Third Presbyterian (510) Precincts; and part of the City of Virginia Beach comprised of the Bayside (020), Hagood (086), Kingston (007), Lake Joyce (090), Lake Smith (019), Little Neck (092), Ocean Park (017), Shelton Park (059), Thoroughgood (018), and Witchduck (038) Precincts and parts of the Chesapeake Beach (037), Old Donation (015), and Shell (069) Precincts.Eighty-fourth. Part of the City of Virginia Beach comprised of the Brookwood (077), Buckner (074), Courthouse (035), Foxfire (060), Green Run (046), Holland (029), Hunt (066), Landstown (062), Magic Hollow (055), North Landing (088), Ocean Lakes (003), Rock Lake (081), Shelbourne (082), Strawbridge (083), and Upton (085) Precincts.Eighty-fifth. Part of the City of Virginia Beach comprised of the Arrowhead (023), Avalon (025), Bonney (040), Brandon (042), Fairfield (026), Homestead (052), Larkspur (024), Lexington (091), Mt. Trashmore (013), Pembroke (039), Pleasant Hill (079), Point O’ View (022), Providence (027), Shannon (053), Tallwood (084), and Village (076) Precincts and parts of the Aragona (016), Old Donation (015), and Reon (080) Precincts.Eighty-sixth. Part of Fairfax County comprised of the Clearview (321), Coppermine (239), Floris (203), Fox Mill (229), Herndon #1 (319), Herndon #2 (320), Herndon #3 (324), Hutchison (325), Stuart (236), and Sugarland (327) Precincts and parts of the Franklin (905), Kinross (908), and Lees Corner West (927) Precincts; and part of Loudoun County comprised of the Forest Grove (705) and Sully (701) Precincts and part of the Park View (702) Precinct.Eighty-seventh. Part of Loudoun County comprised of the Buchanan (211), Carter (117), Cascades (210), Claude Moore Park (212), Freedom (112), Guilford (704), Hutchison (109), Legacy (116), Mercer (108), Mirror Ridge (608), Oak Grove (110), and Rolling Ridge (703) Precincts and parts of the Countryside (213), Dulles South (114), Mill Run (113), Park View (702), and Pinebrook (115) Precincts; and part of Prince William County comprised of the Evergreen (401) Precinct and part of the Alvey (406) Precinct.Eighty-eighth. Part of Fauquier County comprised of the Lois (104), Morrisville (301), and Remington (302) Precincts; part of Spotsylvania County comprised of the Brent’s Mill (702), Elys Ford (201), Grange Hall (303), Hazel Run (302), Ni River (203), Plank Road (301), and Wilderness (202) Precincts; part of Stafford County comprised of the Hartwood (101), Ramoth (104), Rocky Run (102), and Simpson (103) Precincts and parts of the Hampton (703) and Whitson (702) Precincts; and part of the City of Fredericksburg comprised of the District 1 (101) and District 3 (301) Precincts and part of the District 4 (401) Precinct.Eighty-ninth. Part of the City of Norfolk comprised of the Ballentine (301), Berkley (402), Ghent Square (203), Hunton Y (411), Immanuel (204), Lafayette (205), Lafayette-Winona (305), Lambert’s Point (207), Larchmont Library (208), Larchmont Recreation Center (209), Lindenwood (306), Maury (210), Norview Methodist (308), Norview Middle School (309), Park Place (212), Rosemont (310), Stuart (214), Tucker House (105), Union Chapel (313), Willard (218), and Young Park (414) Precincts and parts of the Brambleton (403), Granby (101), Titustown Center (104), and Zion Grace (106) Precincts.Ninetieth. Part of the City of Norfolk comprised of the Bowling Park (303), Campostella (404), Chesterfield (405), Coleman Place School (304), Easton (408), Fairlawn (409), Ingleside (412), Poplar Halls (413), Sherwood Rec Center (311), Sherwood School (312), Tanner’s Creek (302), and United Way (415) Precincts and part of the Brambleton (403) Precinct; and part of the City of Virginia Beach comprised of the Baker (061), College Park (041), Davis Corner (021), Newtown (093), and Sherry Park (057) Precincts and parts of the Aragona (016), Reon (080), and Shell (069) Precincts.Ninety-first. All of the City of Poquoson; part of York County comprised of the Bethel (502), Coventry (203), and Tabb (501) Precincts and part of the Harwoods Mill (401) Precinct; and part of the City of Hampton comprised of the Asbury (205), Booker (201), Bryan (202), Burbank (203), Langley (209), Machen (210), Phillips (213), Phoebus (110), and Syms (113) Precincts.Ninety-second. Part of the City of Hampton comprised of the Aberdeen (101), Armstrong (106), Bassette (102), City Hall (103), Cooper (104), East Hampton (105), Forrest (204), Hampton Library (111), Jones (116), Kecoughtan (117), Kraft (208), Lindsay (107), Mallory (118), Phenix (109), Smith (112), Thomas (108), Tyler (215), and Wythe (115) Precincts.Ninety-third. All of the City of Williamsburg; part of James City County comprised of the Berkeley A Part 2 (1012), Jamestown A (201), Jamestown B (202), Roberts A Part 1 (5011), Roberts A Part 2 (5012), Roberts B (502), Roberts C Part 1 (5031), and Roberts C Part 2 (5032) Precincts; part of York County comprised of the Kiln Creek (204) Precinct and parts of the Edgehill (303) and Harwoods Mill (401) Precincts; and part of the City of Newport News comprised of the Bland (201), Greenwood (110), Kiln Creek (218), McIntosh (104), Richneck (107), and Windsor (109) Precincts and parts of the Lee Hall (108) and Reservoir (106) Precincts.Ninety-fourth. Part of the City of Newport News comprised of the Boulevard (202), Charles (203), Deep Creek (205), Hidenwood (208), Hilton (209), Nelson (210), Oyster Point (105), River (314), Riverside (212), Riverview (217), Sanford (213), Sedgefield (315), Warwick (215), Watkins (320), Wellesley (204), and Yates (216) Precincts and parts of the Deer Park (219), Denbigh (101), Epes (102), Jenkins (103), Lee Hall (108), Palmer (211), and Reservoir (106) Precincts.Ninety-fifth. Part of the City of Hampton comprised of the Bethel (212), Sandy Bottom (216), and Tucker Capps (214) Precincts; and part of the City of Newport News comprised of the Briarfield (302), Carver (303), Chestnut (304), Downtown (305), Dunbar (306), Huntington (307), Jefferson (308), Magruder (309), Marshall (310), Newmarket (311), Newsome Park (312), Reed (313), Saunders (319), South Morrison (316), Washington (317), and Wilson (318) Precincts and parts of the Deer Park (219), Denbigh (101), Epes (102), Jenkins (103), Palmer (211), and Reservoir (106) Precincts.Ninety-sixth. Part of James City County comprised of the Berkeley A Part 1 (101), Berkeley B Part 1 (1021), Berkeley B Part 2 (1022), Berkeley C (103), Powhatan A (301), Powhatan B (302), Powhatan C (303), Powhatan D (304), Stonehouse A (401), Stonehouse B (402), and Stonehouse C (403) Precincts; and part of York County comprised of the Dare (402), Harris Grove (302), Magruder (104), Queens Lake (101), Seaford (301), Waller Mill (103), and Yorktown (102) Precincts and part of the Edgehill (303) Precinct.Ninety-seventh. All of New Kent County; part of Hanover County comprised of the Battlefield (401), Beaverdam Creek (406), Black Creek (404), Clay (301), Cold Harbor (403), Georgetown (506), Hanover Grove (604), Laurel Meadow (507), Mechanicsville (603), Newman (503), Old Church (402), Pebble Creek (405), Rural Point (502), Shady Grove (303), Stonewall Jackson (602), Studley (504), Totopotomoy (505), and Village (601) Precincts; and part of King William County comprised of the Aylett (301), Mangohick (501), and Manquin (401) Precincts and part of the Courthouse (202) Precinct.Ninety-eighth. All of Essex, Gloucester, King and Queen, Mathews, and Middlesex Counties; and part of King William County comprised of the Sweet Hall (201) and West Point (101) Precincts and part of the Courthouse (202) Precinct.Ninety-ninth. All of King George, Lancaster, Northumberland, Richmond, and Westmoreland Counties; and part of Caroline County comprised of the Bowling Green (101) and Port Royal (301) Precincts.One hundredth. All of Accomack and Northampton Counties; part of the City of Norfolk comprised of the Crossroads (511), Northside (103), Ocean View Center (506), Ocean View School (102), Oceanair (508), Suburban Park (215), and Wesley (217) Precincts and part of the Granby (101) Precinct; and part of the City of Virginia Beach comprised of part of the Chesapeake Beach (037) Precinct.

History.

2011, Sp. Sess. I, c. 1.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, Special Session I, c. 1 was subject to preclearance by the Department of Justice, pursuant to section 5 of the federal Voting Rights Act. Preclearance was granted by letter dated June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, Sp. Sess. I, c. 1 was effective April 29, 2011, pursuant to Va. Const., Art. II, § 6.